Utah statutes.
76-1-401.   "Single criminal episode" defined -- Joinder of offenses and defendants.

In this part unless the context requires a different definition, "single criminal episode" means all conduct which is closely related in time and is incident to an attempt or an accomplishment of a single criminal objective.

Nothing in this part shall be construed to limit or modify the effect of Section 77-8a-1 in controlling the joinder of offenses and defendants in criminal proceedings.



Amended by Chapter 20, 1995 General Session

